Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 15 Domestic Abuse Prevention

15-15-1.
Definitions.

The following words as used in this chapter have the following meanings:

“Course of conduct” means a pattern of conduct composed of a series of acts over a period of time, evidencing a continuity of purpose. Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of “course of conduct.”

“Courts” means the family court.

“Cyberstalking” means transmitting any communication by computer to any person or causing any person to be contacted for the sole purpose of harassing that person or his or her family.

“Domestic abuse” means:

The occurrence of one or more of the following acts between present or former family members, parents, stepparents, a plaintiff parent’s minor child(ren) to which the defendant is not a blood relative or relative by marriage, adult plaintiffs who are or have been in a substantive dating or engagement relationship within the past one year and who are (either individually or together) parents of minor children, or persons who are or have been in a substantive dating or engagement relationship within the past one year in which at least one of the persons is a minor:

Attempting to cause or causing physical harm;

Placing another in fear of imminent serious physical harm;

Causing another to engage involuntarily in sexual relations by force, threat of force, or duress; or

Stalking or cyberstalking.

“Harassing” means following a knowing and willful course of conduct directed at a specific person with the intent to seriously alarm, annoy, or bother the person, and which serves no legitimate purpose. The course of conduct must be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, or be in fear of bodily injury.

“Parents” mean persons who together are the legal parents of one or more children, regardless of their marital status or whether they have lived together at any time.

“Present or former family member” means the spouse, former spouse, minor children, stepchildren, a plaintiff parent’s minor child(ren) to which the defendant is not a blood relative or relative by marriage, minor children of substantive dating partners, or persons who are related by blood or marriage.

“Sexual exploitation” means the occurrence of any of the following acts by any person who knowingly or willfully encourages, aids, or coerces any child under the age of eighteen (18) years:

Recruiting, employing, enticing, soliciting, isolating, harboring, transporting, providing, persuading, obtaining, or maintaining, or so attempting, any minor for the purposes of commercial sex acts or sexually explicit performances; or selling or purchasing a minor for the purposes of commercial sex acts.

“Commercial sex act” means any sex act or sexually explicit performance on account of which anything of value is given, promised to, or received, directly or indirectly, by any person.

“Sexually explicit performance” means an act or show, intended to arouse, satisfy the sexual desires of, or appeal to the prurient interests of patrons or viewers, whether public or private, live, photographed, recorded, or videotaped.

“Stalking” means harassing another person or willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly following another person with the intent to place that person in reasonable fear of bodily injury.

“Substantive dating” or “engagement relationship” means a significant and personal/intimate relationship that shall be adjudged by the court’s consideration of the following factors:

The length of time of the relationship;

The type of relationship; and

The frequency of interaction between the parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 259, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 27; P.L. 2006, ch. 324, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 652, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 5; P.L. 2021, ch. 111, § 2, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 112, § 2, effective July 2, 2021.

15-15-2.
Filing of complaint.

Proceedings under this chapter shall be filed, heard, and determined in the family court of the county in which the plaintiff resides and shall be independent of divorce proceedings.

Any proceedings under this chapter shall not preclude any other available civil or criminal remedies.

A party filing a complaint under this chapter may do so without payment of any filing fee, but shall be required to disclose any prior or pending actions for divorce or separation.

If the plaintiff has left the residence or household to avoid abuse, he or she may bring the action in the court of previous residence or the court of present residence. There shall be no minimum residence requirements for the bringing of an action under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 389, § 1.

15-15-3.
Protective orders — Penalty — Jurisdiction.

A person, or a parent, custodian, or legal guardian on behalf of a minor child or the director of the department of children, youth and families (“DCYF”) or its designee for a child in the custody of DCYF, pursuant to §§

40-11-7

and

40-11-7.1

, suffering from domestic abuse or sexual exploitation as defined in §

15-15-1

, may file a complaint in the family court requesting any order that will protect and support her or him from abuse or sexual exploitation, including, but not limited to, the following:

Ordering that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting, molesting, sexually exploiting, or interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street, or elsewhere, whether the defendant is an adult or a minor;

Ordering the defendant to vacate the household immediately, and further providing in the order for the safety and welfare of all household animals and pets;

Awarding the plaintiff custody of the minor children of the parties, if any;

Ordering the defendant to surrender physical possession of all firearms in his or her possession, care, custody, or control and shall further order a person restrained not to purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect. The defendant shall surrender said firearms within twenty-four (24) hours of notice of the protective order to the Rhode Island state police or local police department or to a federally licensed firearms dealer.

A person ordered to surrender possession of any firearm(s) pursuant to this section shall, within seventy-two (72) hours after being served with the order, either:

File with the court a receipt showing the firearm(s) was physically surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or local police department, or to a federally licensed firearms dealer; or

Attest to the court that, at the time of the order, the person had no firearms in his or her immediate physical possession or control, or subject to their immediate physical possession or control, and that the person, at the time of the attestation, has no firearms in their immediate physical possession or control, or subject to their immediate physical possession or control.

If a person restrained under this section transfers a firearm(s) to a federally licensed firearms dealer pursuant to this section, the person restrained under this section may instruct the federally licensed firearms dealer to sell the firearm(s) or to transfer ownership, in accordance with state and federal law, to a qualified named individual who is not a member of the person’s dwelling house, who is not related to the person by blood, marriage, or relationship as defined by §

15-15-1

(7), and who is not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. The owner of any firearm(s) sold shall receive any financial value received from its sale, less the cost associated with taking possession of, storing, and transferring of the firearm(s).

Every individual to whom ownership of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this subsection shall be prohibited from transferring or returning any firearm(s) to the person restrained under this section while the protective order remains in effect and shall be informed of this prohibition, Any knowing violation of this subsection is a felony that shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a term of not less than one year and not more than five (5) years, or both.

An individual to whom ownership of a firearm(s) is transferred pursuant to this subsection shall return a firearm(s) to the person formerly restrained under this section only if the person formerly restrained under this section provides documentation issued by a court indicating that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person from purchasing, carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been extended;

After notice to the respondent and a hearing, ordering either party to make payments for the support of a minor child or children of the parties as required by law for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days, unless the child support order is for a child or children receiving public assistance pursuant to chapter 5.1 of title 40. In these cases, legal counsel for the division of taxation, child support enforcement, shall be notified as a party in interest to appear for the purpose of establishing a child support order under a new or existing docket number previously assigned to the parties and not under the protective docket number. The child support order shall remain in effect until the court modifies or suspends the order.

After notice to the respondent and a hearing, which shall be held within fifteen (15) days of surrendering said firearms, the court, in addition to any other restrictions, may, for any protective order issued after or renewed on or after July 1, 2017, continue the order of surrender, and shall further order a person restrained under this section not to purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms while the protective order is in effect.

The family court shall provide a notice on all forms requesting a protective order that a person restrained under this section shall be ordered pursuant to §

11-47-5

to surrender possession of any firearms while the protective order is in effect. The form shall further provide that any person who has surrendered his or her firearms shall be afforded a hearing within fifteen (15) days of surrendering his or her firearms.

Any firearm surrendered in accordance with this section to the Rhode Island state police or local police department shall be returned to the person formerly restrained under this section upon his or her request when:

The person formerly restrained under this section produces documentation issued by a court indicating that the restraining order issued pursuant to this section that prohibited the person from purchasing, carrying, transporting, or possessing firearms has expired and has not been extended; and

The law enforcement agency in possession of the firearms determined that the person formerly restrained under this section is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a firearm under state or federal law.

The person required to surrender their firearms pursuant to this section shall not be responsible for any costs of storage of any firearms surrendered pursuant to this section.

The Rhode Island state police are authorized to develop rules and procedures pertaining to the storage and return of firearms surrendered to the Rhode Island state police or local police departments pursuant to this section. The Rhode Island state police may consult with the Rhode Island Police Chiefs’ Association in developing rules and procedures.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, expand, or in any way modify orders issued under §

12-29-7

or §

15-5-19

.

Nothing in this section shall limit a defendant’s right under existing law to petition the court at a later date for modification of the order.

The court shall immediately notify the person suffering from domestic abuse whose complaint gave rise to the protective order, and the law enforcement agency where the person restrained under this section resides, of the hearing.

The person suffering from domestic abuse, local law enforcement, and the person restrained under this section shall all have an opportunity to be present and to testify when the court considers the petition.

At the hearing, the person restrained under this section shall have the burden of showing, by clear and convincing evidence, that, if his or her firearm rights were restored, he or she would not pose a danger to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person.

In determining whether to restore a person’s firearm rights, the court shall examine all relevant evidence, including, but not limited to: the complaint seeking a protective order; the criminal record of the person restrained under this section; the mental health history of the person restrained under this section; any evidence that the person restrained under this section has, since being served with the order, engaged in violent or threatening behavior against the person suffering from domestic abuse or any other person.

If the court determines, after a review of all relevant evidence and after all parties have had an opportunity to be heard, that the person restrained under this section would not pose a danger to the person suffering from domestic abuse or to any other person if his or her firearm rights were restored, then the court may grant the petition and modify the protective order and lift the firearm prohibition.

If the court lifts a person’s firearms prohibition pursuant to this subsection, the court shall issue the person written notice that he or she is no longer prohibited under this section from purchasing or possessing firearms while the protective order is in effect.

The prohibition against possessing a firearm(s) due solely to the existence of a domestic violence restraining order issued under this section shall not apply with respect to sworn peace officers as defined in §

12-7-21

and active members of military service, including members of the reserve components thereof, who are required by law or departmental policy to carry departmental firearms while on duty or any person who is required by his or her employment to carry a firearm in the performance of his or her duties. Any individual exempted pursuant to this exception may possess a firearm only during the course of his or her employment. Any firearm required for employment must be stored at the place of employment when not being possessed for employment use; all other firearm(s) must be surrendered in accordance with this section.

Upon motion by the plaintiff, his or her address shall be released only at the discretion of the family court judge.

Any violation of the protective orders in subsection (a) of this section shall subject the defendant to being found in contempt of court.

The contempt order shall not be exclusive and shall not preclude any other available civil or criminal remedies. Any relief granted by the court shall be for a fixed period of time not to exceed three (3) years, at the expiration of which time the court may extend any order, upon motion of the plaintiff, for any additional time, that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse. The court may modify its order at any time upon motion of either party.

Any violation of a protective order under this chapter of which the defendant has actual notice shall be a misdemeanor that shall be punished by a fine of no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

The penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided by §

12-29-5

.

Actual notice means that the defendant has received a copy of the order by service or by being handed a copy of the order by a police officer pursuant to §

15-15-5(d)

.

The district court shall have criminal jurisdiction over all adult violations of this chapter.

The family court shall have jurisdiction over all juvenile violations of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 222, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 7; P.L. 2005, ch. 149, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 153, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 374, § 5; P.L. 2017, ch. 385, § 5; P.L. 2019, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 46, § 1.

15-15-4.
Temporary orders — Ex parte proceedings.

Upon the filing of a complaint under this chapter, the court may enter any temporary orders that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff from abuse, including relief as provided in chapter 5 of this title.

If it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit or by the verified complaint that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the plaintiff before notice can be served and a hearing held on the matter, the court may enter any temporary order without notice that it deems necessary to protect the plaintiff. Every order granted without notice shall expire by its terms within any time after entry, not to exceed twenty-one (21) days, that the court fixes, unless within the time fixed the order, by consent or for good cause shown and after hearing of argument by the parties or counsel, is extended for an additional period. In case a temporary order is granted without notice, the matter shall be set down for a hearing within a reasonable time and may be given precedence of all matters except older matters of the same character, and when the matter comes on for a hearing, the party who obtained the temporary order shall proceed with the complaint for an order pursuant to §

15-15-3

and, if he or she does not do so, the court shall dissolve the temporary order.

When the court is unavailable after the close of business, a family court judge may grant relief to the plaintiff as provided in this chapter. At the discretion of the judge, the relief may be granted and communicated by telephone to an officer of the appropriate law enforcement agency who shall record the order on a form of order promulgated for such use by the chief judge of the family court and shall deliver a copy of the order on the next court day to the clerk of the court.

In addition, when there is no family court in session at a location when a division of the district court is in session, the district court judge at the division is authorized to grant relief to the plaintiff under this chapter upon cause shown in an ex parte proceeding.

No temporary order shall be granted pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection unless it clearly appears from specific facts shown in plaintiff ’s written statement that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the plaintiff before notice can be served and a hearing held on the matter.

Any temporary order granted pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection expires at close of the next business day unless a longer time is granted by the family court judge.

Any order issued under this section and any documentation in support of it shall be filed immediately with the clerk of the family court. Filing shall have the effect of commencing proceedings under this chapter and invoking the other provisions of this chapter, but shall not be deemed necessary for an emergency order issued under this chapter to take effect.

The clerk of the family court shall have a certified copy of any order issued under this chapter forwarded immediately to the law enforcement agency designated by the plaintiff. The clerk shall also provide the plaintiff with two (2) certified copies of any order issued under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 315, § 1.

15-15-4.1.
Return of service/alternate service.

The complaint and any order issued under this chapter shall be personally served upon the defendant by a member of the division of sheriffs except as provided in subsections (c), (d), and (f) of this section. Service shall be made without payment of any fee when service is made by a deputy sheriff. At the election of the plaintiff, service, pursuant to the subsection, may also be made by a certified constable authorized to serve process pursuant to §

9-5-10.1

. The constable shall be entitled to receive the fee allowed by law for the service of a family court summons. Where the defendant is a minor, the complaint and any order issued under this chapter shall also be personally served upon a parent or guardian of the minor.

Return of service shall be forwarded by the deputy sheriff or certified constable to the clerk of court prior to the date set down for a hearing on the complaint. If service has not been made, the deputy sheriff or constable shall indicate on the summons the reason and the attempts made to serve the defendant.

At the time the return of service is sent to the clerk of the court, the deputy sheriff or certified constable shall cause a copy of the return of service to be sent to the plaintiff and to the appropriate law enforcement agency.

If, at the time of the hearing on the complaint, the court determines that after diligent effort the deputy sheriff or certified constable has been unable to serve the defendant personally, the judge may order an alternate method of service designed to give reasonable notice of the action to the defendant and taking into consideration the plaintiff’s ability to afford the means of service ordered. Alternative service shall include, but not be limited to: service by certified and regular mail at defendant’s last known address (excluding the residence which he or she has been ordered to vacate) or place of employment, leaving copies at the defendant’s dwelling or usual place of abode with a person of suitable age and discretion residing at the defendant’s dwelling or usual place of abode, or by publication in a newspaper for two (2) consecutive weeks. The court shall set a new date for the hearing on the complaint and shall extend the temporary order until that date.

If the defendant appears in person before the court, the necessity for further service is waived and proof of service of that order is not necessary.

If the defendant is served notice regarding the complaint and hearing, but does not appear at the hearing, the clerk of the family court will mail the defendant a copy of the resulting order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 48; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 26; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 26.

15-15-5.
Duties of police officers.

Whenever any police officer has reason to believe that a family member or parent has been abused, that officer shall use all reasonable means to prevent further abuse, including:

Remaining on the scene as long as there is a danger to the physical safety of the person or until the person is able to leave the dwelling unit;

Assisting the person in obtaining medical treatment necessitated by an assault, including obtaining transportation to an emergency medical treatment facility;

Giving the person immediate and adequate notice of his or her rights under this chapter;

Arresting the abusive person pursuant to the arrest provisions in §

12-29-3

; and

Reporting any physical injury to a minor child or a threat to physically injure a minor child within twenty-four (24) hours of his or her investigation to CANTS (Child abuse and neglect tracking system).

Notice by the police officer to the victim shall be by handing the victim a copy of the following statement written in English, Portuguese, Spanish, Cambodian, Hmong, Laotian, Vietnamese, and French, and by reading the statement to the person when possible:

“If your attacker is your spouse, former spouse, or person to whom you are related by blood or marriage, or if you are not married to your attacker but have a child in common, or if you and/or your attacker is a minor who have been in a substantive dating or engagement relationship within the past one year, you have the right to go to the family court and request:

“(1) An order restraining your attacker from abusing you, your minor child, or a plaintiff parent’s minor child(ren) to which the defendant is not a blood relative or relative by marriage;

“(2) An order awarding you exclusive use of your marital domicile;

“(3) An order awarding you custody of your minor child.”

“If you are not married or related to your attacker, but have resided with him or her within the past three (3) years, or you are in or have been in a substantive dating or engagement relationship with your attacker within the past one year, you have the right to go to the district court and request:

“(1) An order restraining your attacker from abusing you;

“(2) An order directing your attacker to leave your household, unless he or she has the sole legal interest in the household.”

“If you are in need of medical treatment, you have the right to have the officer present obtain transportation to an emergency medical treatment facility.

“If you believe that police protection is needed for your physical safety, you have the right to have the officer present remain at the scene until you and your children can leave or until your safety is otherwise ensured.

“You have the right to file a criminal complaint with the responding officer or your local police department if the officer has not arrested the perpetrator.”

A police officer shall ensure enforcement of the terms of a protective order issued pursuant to this chapter including, but not limited to, accompanying a family member or parent to his or her dwelling or residence in order to secure possession of the dwelling or residence.

When service of the temporary order issued pursuant to §

15-15-4

has not been made and/or after a permanent order is entered, a police officer shall give notice of the order to the defendant by handing him or her a certified copy of the order. The officer shall indicate that he or she has given notice by writing on plaintiff ’s copy of the order and the police department’s copy of the order, the date and time of giving notice and the officer’s name and badge number. The officer shall indicate on the offense report that actual notice was given.

SPOUSE, FORMER SPOUSE, BLOOD RELATIVE, CHILDRENIN COMMON, MINORS IN SUBSTANTIVE DATINGOR ENGAGEMENT RELATIONSHIP, PLAINTIFF PARENT’SMINOR CHILD(REN) TO WHICH DEFENDANT IS NOT A BLOODRELATIVE OR RELATIVE BY MARRIAGE.

Click to view

UNMARRIED/NOT RELATED COHABITANTS WITHINTHE PAST THREE YEARS, OR HAVE BEEN IN ASUBSTANTIVE DATING OR ENGAGEMENTRELATIONSHIP WITHIN THE PAST ONE YEAR

Click to view

ADDITIONAL RIGHTS.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 70; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 63, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 68, § 2.

15-15-6.
Form of complaint.

A form in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of filing a complaint under this chapter:

STATE OF RHODE ISLAND FAMILY COURT COUNTY OF : Plaintiff : : VS. : F.C. NO. : : Defendant : COMPLAINT FOR PROTECTION FROM ABUSE Pursuant to Chapter 15 of this title, I request that the court enter an order protecting me from abuse. (1) My full name, present street address, city, and telephone number are as follows: (2) My former residence, which I have left to avoid abuse, is as follows (street address and city): (3) The full name, present street address, city, and telephone number of the person causing me abuse (the defendant) are as follows: (4) My relationship to the defendant is as follows: We (are) (were formerly) married to one another. I am the defendant’s (child) (parent). I am the blood relative or relative by marriage of the defendant; specifically, the defendant is my . I and the defendant are together the legal parents of one or more children in common. I and the defendant have had a substantive dating or engagement relationship. I am a parent of a minor child(ren) in my care or custody, to which defendant is not a blood relative or relative by marriage. (5) On or about , I suffered abuse when the defendant: Threatened or harmed me with a weapon; (type of weapon used: ) Attempted to cause me physical harm; Caused me physical harm; Placed me in fear of imminent physical harm; Caused me to engage involuntarily in sexual relations by force, threat of force, or duress. Specifically, the defendant (6) I ask that: The court order that the defendant be restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting, molesting, or otherwise interfering with the plaintiff at home, on the street or elsewhere. The court order the defendant to immediately leave the household which is located at The court award me temporary custody of the following minor child(ren)(the defendant and I are husband and wife): Names Date of Birth That I request that the above relief be ordered without notice because it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit or by the verified complaint that I will suffer immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage before notice can be served and a hearing had thereon. I understand that the court will schedule a hearing no later than twenty-one (21) days after the order is entered on the question of continuing the temporary order. (7) I have not sought protection from abuse from any other judge of the family court arising out of the facts or circumstances alleged in this complaint. (8) That the court award me support for my minor children as required by law for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days. (Signature) (Date) Subscribed and sworn to before me in in the county of in the state of Rhode Island, this day of A.D. 20. Notary Public Note: If this complaint is filed by an attorney, the attorney’s certificate should appear as below: ATTORNEY CERTIFICATE Signed: Attorney for Plaintiff Address: Date: , 20 WHITE COPY — Court YELLOW COPY — Plaintiff PINK COPY — Defendant GOLDENROD COPY — Police Department (b) A form in substantially the following language shall suffice for the purpose of requesting temporary orders under this chapter: STATE OF RHODE ISLAND FAMILY COURT COUNTY OF : Plaintiff : : VS. : F.C. NO. : : Defendant : TEMPORARY ORDER PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 15 OF THIS TITLE GENERAL LAWS OF RHODE ISLAND Upon consideration of plaintiff’s complaint and having found that immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage will result to the plaintiff before a notice can be served and a hearing had thereon it is ORDERED: That the defendant is restrained and enjoined from contacting, assaulting, molesting, or otherwise interfering with plaintiff and any minor children of the plaintiff at home, on the street, or elsewhere, to wit, That the defendant vacate forthwith the household located at That the plaintiff, being the [husband] [wife] of the defendant, be and [s]he hereby is awarded temporary custody of the minor child[ren], to wit, . That the defendant pay to the plaintiff for the support of the minor child(ren) the sum of $ per . That A hearing on the continuation of this ORDER will be held at the family court, County, at [A.M.] [P.M.] on . If the defendant wishes to be heard, [s]he will be heard at that time. If [s]he does not appear at that time, this ORDER shall remain in effect. This ORDER is effective forthwith, and will remain in effect until the time and date of the above-mentioned hearing. A copy of this ORDER shall be transmitted to the appropriate local law enforcement agency forthwith, and shall be served in-hand on the defendant herein. ENTERED as an order of court this day of , A.D. 20.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 66, § 1.

15-15-7.
Notice of penalty.

Each protective order issued under this chapter, including a temporary ex parte order, shall have the following statement printed in bold faced type or in capital letters:

A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS ORDER MAY BE GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND MAY BE PUNISHED BY A FINE OF AS MUCH AS ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($1,000) AND/OR BY CONFINEMENT IN JAIL FOR AS LONG AS ONE YEAR, AND MAY BE ORDERED TO ATTEND COUNSELING.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 223, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 2.

15-15-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 195, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 284, § 1, effective July 3, 2006. For present comparable provisions, see chapter 15.1 of this title.